Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 23 Nonalcoholic Bottled Beverages, Drinks and Juices

21-23-1.
Bottlers’ permits required for manufacture or sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to manufacture or bottle for sale or to sell or offer for sale any carbonated or nonalcoholic beverage, soda water, fruit juice, syrup, bottled drinking water either plain or carbonated, or any other so-called soft drink, without a permit from the department of health. No carbonated or nonalcoholic beverage, soda water, fruit juice, syrup, bottled drinking water either plain or carbonated, or any other so-called soft drink, which has been manufactured outside of this state shall be sold or offered for sale within this state unless the person, firm, or corporation manufacturing or bottling it for sale shall hold a permit to do so from the department of health. The permit shall be known as a “bottlers’ permit” and the person, firm, or corporation receiving the permit shall be known as the “bottler”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 183, § 15; P.L. 1919, ch. 1781, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2073, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 15; P.L. 1927, ch. 1059, § 1; P.L. 1928, ch. 1190, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-23-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 581, § 1.

21-23-2.
Issuance and renewal of permits — Fee — Posting — Exempt cider.

Blank forms of the application for permits shall be furnished by the department without cost. The fee for the permit shall be as set forth in §

23-1-54

. The fee for a permit to manufacture or bottle apple cider shall also be as set forth in §

23-1-54

. In order to set the license renewal dates so that all activities for each establishment can be combined on one license instead of on several licenses, the department of health shall set the license renewal date. The license period shall be for twelve (12) months, commencing on the license renewal date, and the license fee shall be at the full annual rate regardless of the date of application or the date of issuance of license. If the license renewal date is changed, the department may make an adjustment to the fees of licensed establishments, not to exceed the annual license fee, in order to implement the change in license renewal date. Any person applying for a permit to bottle or manufacture apple cider shall certify that he or she does not manufacture or bottle any carbonated or nonalcoholic beverage, soda water, fruit juice, syrup, bottled drinking water, either plain or carbonated, or any other so-called soft drink, other than apple cider. The fee received by the department for “bottlers’ permits” shall be turned over to the general treasurer. All permits granted under this chapter shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises of the bottler so that they may readily be seen by any person inspecting the premises; provided that the fees so far as they relate to cider, shall not apply to any person who manufactures and bottles during any one calendar year not exceeding five hundred (500) gallons of cider.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 183, § 15; P.L. 1919, ch. 1781, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2073, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 15; P.L. 1927, ch. 1059, § 1; P.L. 1928, ch. 1190, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-23-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 76, § 21; P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 52, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 40; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 33.

21-23-3.
Suspension or revocation of permits.

Permits granted under this chapter may be suspended or revoked by the department of health for violation of any provision of this chapter or the regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter or of chapter 27 of this title or chapter 31 of this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 183, § 16; P.L. 1919, ch. 1781, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-23-3

; P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 49.

21-23-4.
Adoption of regulations.

All nonalcoholic beverage, drink, or juice regulations and any amendments to them adopted pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., are the bottled beverage regulations in this state. The department may, by regulation, provide for modification or deviation from those regulations, whether or not the modifications or deviations are in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

The director of health is authorized to adopt any other regulations for bottled beverages he or she deems necessary in accordance with authority granted under this chapter, chapter 27 of this title and §

23-1-18(5)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 49.

21-23-5.
Contamination of containers.

Whoever by himself or herself or by his or her servant or agent, or as the servant or agent of any other person, firm, or corporation having custody of a reusable jar, bottle, measure, or other vessel used as a container for any carbonated or nonalcoholic beverage, soda water, fruit juice or drink, bottled drinking water either plain or carbonated, or any other so-called soft drink, places or causes or permits to be placed in it any offal, kerosene, or article other than waters or beverages as enumerated in this chapter, or any agent used for cleaning the jar, bottle, measure or other vessel, shall be punished by a fine of ten dollars ($10.00) for each reusable misused container.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 183, § 20; P.L. 1919, ch. 1781, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

21-23-7

; P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 581, § 1.

21-23-6.
Retailers exempt.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to dealers at retail who purchase from the bottler of any carbonated or nonalcoholic beverage, soda water, fruit juice, bottled drinking water either plain or carbonated, or any other so-called soft drink.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 183, § 21; P.L. 1919, ch. 1781, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 21; G.L. 1956, § 21-23-8; P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 581, § 1.

21-23-7.
Inspections and reports.

It shall be the duty of the department of health to make at least quarterly inspections of all places or premises for which permits are issued and a report kept on file at the office of the department of health as to the sanitary condition maintained by the bottler. The department shall make inspections at any time it shall determine.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 183, § 16; P.L. 1919, ch. 1781, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, § 21-23-9; P.L. 1979, ch. 384, § 1.